Washington statutes.
RCW 10.109.030

Limitations on use.

For state and local agencies, a body worn camera may only be used by officers employed by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020, any officer employed by the department of corrections, and personnel for jails as defined in RCW 70.48.020 and detention facilities as defined in RCW 13.40.020.

[ 2018 c 285 s 3; 2016 c 163 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 163: See note following RCW 42.56.240.